Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Jurisdiction over Foreign Representatives

§ 15-4-301. Jurisdiction by act of foreign personal representative.

A foreign personal representative submits himself to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in his capacity as a personal representative of the estate by:

filing authenticated copies of his appointment as provided in section 15-4-204[, Idaho Code,] of this code;

receiving payment of money or taking delivery of personal property under section 15-4-201[, Idaho Code,] of this code; or

doing any act as a personal representative in this state which would have given the state jurisdiction over him as an individual.

Jurisdiction under subsection (b) of this section is limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

§ 15-4-302. Jurisdiction by act of decedent.

In addition to jurisdiction conferred by section 15-4-301[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, a foreign personal representative is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to the same extent that his decedent was subject to jurisdiction immediately prior to death.

§ 15-4-303. Service on foreign personal representative.

Service of process may be made upon the foreign personal representative by registered or certified mail, addressed to his last reasonably ascertainable address, requesting a return receipt signed by addressee only. Notice by ordinary first class mail is sufficient if registered or certified mail service to the addressee is unavailable. Service may be made upon a foreign personal representative in the manner in which service could have been made under other laws of this state on either the foreign personal representative or his decedent immediately prior to death.

If service is made upon a foreign personal representative as provided in subsection (a) of this section, he shall be allowed at least thirty (30) days within which to appear or respond.